Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1532HV (2) 91 je/jh H.F. 575 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âCombatting Foreign Funding of Higher Education 2 Actâ. 3 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 261K.1 Definitions. 4 1. âContractâ means any agreement, pledge, or memorandum of 5 understanding for the acquisition by purchase, lease, or barter 6 of property or services by a foreign source for the direct 7 benefit or use of either of the parties to the agreement. 8 2. âForeign sourceâ means any of the following: 9 a. A foreign government, including an agency of a foreign 10 government. 11 b. A legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created solely 12 under the laws of a foreign government. 13 c. An individual who is not a citizen or a national of the 14 United States or a territory or protectorate thereof. 15 d. An agent, including a subsidiary or affiliate of a 16 foreign legal entity, acting on behalf of a foreign source. 17 3. âPublic institution of higher educationâ means an 18 institution of higher learning governed by the state board of 19 regents. 20 4. âReportable fundingâ means any contract, gift, grant, 21 endowment, award, or donation, payment in exchange for 22 services, capital investment, salary, wage, compensation, fee, 23 or other monetary exchange, including any pledge, promise, 24 agreement, or expressed intention by a foreign source to 25 provide funding which exceeds fifty thousand dollars in value 26 or is expected to exceed fifty thousand dollars in value over 27 the projected length of the funding relationship between the 28 public institution of higher learning and the foreign source. 29 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 261K.2 Annual report on foreign 30 funding. 31 Annually by December 31, each public institution of higher 32 education shall prepare a report that includes all of the 33 following information: 34 1. The amount of reportable funding received by the 35 -1- LSB 1532HV (2) 91 je/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 575 institution during the previous fiscal year. 1 2. A description of the type of reportable funding received 2 and the purpose thereof, including identification of the 3 contract involved in the funding. 4 3. A detailed description of the foreign source providing 5 the reportable funding, including the name and address of the 6 entity or individual providing the funding. 7 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 261K.3 Procedures for report. 8 1. Annually by January 15, each public institution of higher 9 education shall post the report required by section 261K.2 10 on the institutionâs internet site in an easily accessible 11 format and provide the report to the governor and the general 12 assembly. 13 2. Each public institution of higher education shall 14 regularly update the report posted on the institutionâs 15 internet site. 16 3. A report required by section 261K.2 and any updates to 17 the report are public records for the purposes of chapter 22. 18 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 261K.4 Enforcement. 19 The attorney general may bring an action against a public 20 institution of higher education for a writ of mandamus to 21 compel the institution to comply with this chapter. 22 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 261K.5 Exception. 23 This chapter does not require reporting of payments made 24 by a natural person who would otherwise qualify as a foreign 25 source for tuition or related fees to support an individual 26 matriculating as a student at a public institution of higher 27 education. 28 Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 29 2026. 30